Massachusetts, session 194th, H3566.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 25A of chapter 166 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 67, after the word “attachment”, the following :-
“A utility shall not compel as a condition of attachment a licensee, that is a municipal
light plant established solely for the purposes of providing telecommunication services,
established pursuant to Chapter 164, to incur costs, direct or indirect, including, but not limited
to the production of a surety bond, in excess of such rates for attachment as determined by said
department pursuant to the provisions of this section.”
of 1